Florida, session 2026, SB558.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 13 14 Section 1.âSection 125.5695, Florida Statutes, is created 15 to read: 16 125.5695âStandards for stormwater systems.â 17 (1)âAll stormwater systems owned by counties in this state, 18 when installing new storm pipe and storm structures, must follow 19 the annual Department of Transportationâs Standard 20 Specifications for Road and Bridge Construction contained in the 21 sections âPipe Culvertsâ and âPipe Liner,â except for any 22 requirement that the Department of Transportation review or 23 approve installation plans, inspection videos, or inspection 24 reports. 25 (2)âFinal inspections for all storm pipe and storm 26 structures owned by counties in this state must be performed by 27 a NASSCOâs Pipeline Assessment Certification Program (PACP) 28 certified technician who is employed by a third-party licensed 29 engineering firm or any general contractor that does not have a 30 controlling interest in the company that installed the storm 31 system being inspected. The inspection and video process may use 32 standard closed-circuit television inspection equipment, along 33 with an optional camera with a fisheye lens for video inspection 34 purposes. 35 (3)âThe standards for installation and inspection in 36 subsections (1) and (2) supersede all existing and local 37 standards in counties. 38 Section 2.âSection 166.04815, Florida Statutes, is created 39 to read: 40 166.04815âStandards for stormwater systems.â 41 (1)âAll stormwater systems owned by municipalities in this 42 state, when installing new storm pipe and storm structures, must 43 follow the annual Department of Transportationâs Standard 44 Specifications for Road and Bridge Construction contained in the 45 sections âPipe Culvertsâ and âPipe Liner,â except for any 46 requirement that the Department of Transportation review or 47 approve installation plans, inspection videos, or inspection 48 reports. 49 (2)âFinal inspections for all storm pipe and storm 50 structures owned by municipalities in this state must be 51 performed by a NASSCOâs Pipeline Assessment Certification 52 Program (PACP) certified technician who is employed by a third 53 party licensed engineering firm or any general contractor that 54 does not have a controlling interest in the company that 55 installed the storm system being inspected. The inspection and 56 video process may use standard closed-circuit television 57 inspection equipment, along with an optional camera with a 58 fisheye lens for video inspection purposes. 59 (3)âThe standards for installation and inspection in 60 subsections (1) and (2) supersede all existing and local 61 standards in municipalities. 62 Section 3.âPursuant to s. 18, Article VII of the State 63 Constitution, the Legislature hereby determines and declares 64 that this act fulfills an important state interest. 65 Section 4.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.